Utah statutes.
62A-4a-112.   Request to examine family services payment.
(1)  An individual who is a taxpayer and resident of this state and who
desires to examine a payment for services offered by the division in
accordance with this chapter, shall sign a statement using a form prescribed
by the division.  That statement shall include the assertion that the
individual is a taxpayer and a resident, and shall include a commitment that
any information obtained will not be used for commercial or political
purposes.  No partial or complete list of names, addresses, or amounts of
payment may be made by any individual under this subsection, and none of that
information may be removed from the offices of the division.
(2)  The division shall, after due consideration of the public interest,
define the nature of confidential information to be safeguarded by the
division and shall establish policies and rules to govern the custody and
disclosure of confidential information, as well as to provide access to
information regarding payments for services offered by the division.
(3)  This section does not prohibit the division or its agents, or
individuals, commissions, or agencies duly authorized for the purpose, from
making special studies or from issuing or publishing statistical material and
reports of a general character.  This section does not prohibit the division
or its representatives or employees from conveying or providing to local,
state, or federal governmental agencies written information that would affect
an individual's eligibility or ineligibility for financial service, or other
beneficial programs offered by that governmental agency.  Access to the
division's program plans, policies, and records, as well as consumer records
and data, is governed by Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act.
(4)  Violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
